New Jersey, session 222, A5267.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1. a.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,  a board of education shall suspend, without pay, any school employee, including a tenured or nontenured school employee, who is accused of criminal offenses involving one or more children or of unbecoming conduct involving one or more children, pending the determination of the charge.  If a school employee is suspended pursuant to the provisions of this section, the basis for the suspension shall be identified in a written notice to the employee. The employee shall have 14 days from the date of the written notice to challenge the accuracy of the pending charge. b. If the charge is dismissed, the employee shall be reinstated immediately with full pay from the first day of the suspension. If the pending charge results in conviction, the employee shall be ineligible for continued employment with the board and shall be ineligible for new employment with any other board of education in the State. c. The suspension of employment pursuant to this subsection shall not be subject to any grievance or appeals procedures or tenure proceedings pursuant to any collectively bargained or negotiated agreement or any law, rule, or regulation. 2. A board of education shall report annually to the Commissioner of Education any suspensions made pursuant to the provisions of section 1 of this act, and the final determination of charges related to those suspensions. 3. The Commissioner of Education may withhold State aid, in whole or in part, in the next school year from a school district that fails to comply with the provisions of section 1 or section 2 of this act. 4.  The Commissioner of Education shall annually report to the Governor, and to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), in the month preceding the start of each school year on the number of suspensions reported pursuant to section 2 of this act and any State aid withheld pursuant to section 3 of this act. 5. This act shall take effect immediately.